Connecticut, session 2026, SB00006.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026, and applicable to taxable years
2 commencing on or after January 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
3 (1) "Child" means an individual who is under seventeen years of age;
4 (2) "Eligible taxpayer" means a resident of this state who is subject to
5 the tax under chapter 229 of the general statutes; and
6 (3) "Resident of this state" has the same meaning as provided in
7 subsection (a) of section 12-701 of the general statutes.
8 (b) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2026, any
9 eligible taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by
10 chapter 229 of the general statutes, other than the liability imposed
11 under section 12-707 of the general statutes, for each dependent child of
12 the taxpayer, up to a maximum of three children. The amount of such
13 credit shall be six hundred dollars per child, provided such amount
14 shall be reduced ten per cent for every one thousand dollars, or fraction
15 thereof, of federal adjusted gross income over (1) one hundred thousand
16 dollars for an individual who files a return under the federal income tax
17 as an unmarried individual or a married individual filing separately, (2)
LCO 1 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 6
18 one hundred sixty thousand dollars for an individual who files a return
19 under the federal income tax as a head of household, and (3) two
20 hundred thousand dollars for individuals who file a return under the
21 federal income tax as married individuals filing jointly or as a surviving
22 spouse. If the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to this subsection
23 exceeds the eligible taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed by chapter
24 229 of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Revenue Services shall
25 treat such excess as an overpayment and, except as provided under
26 section 12-739 or 12-742 of the general statutes, refund the amount of
27 such excess, without interest, to the eligible taxpayer.
28 (c) For the purposes of this section, the tax liability of an individual
29 taxpayer shall be calculated without regard to the credit allowed under
30 section 12-704e of the general statutes.
31 Sec. 2. (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the provisions of
32 sections 10-215, 10-215a and 10-266w of the general statutes, for the
33 fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, each eligible school district shall (1)
34 provide school breakfasts and school lunches to all students at no charge
35 to such students, and (2) be eligible to receive a grant from the
36 Department of Education for such school breakfasts and school lunches.
37 As used in this section, "eligible school district" means a local or regional
38 board of education, state or local charter school or an interdistrict
39 magnet school operator that (A) is participating in the federal School
40 Breakfast Program or the National Lunch Program, as the case may be,
41 and (B) is not implementing the Community Eligibility Provision; and
42 "Community Eligibility Provision" means the federal meal
43 reimbursement program administered by the United States Department
44 of Agriculture, as set forth in 7 CFR 245.9, as amended from time to time.
45 Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) No person who is convicted
46 on or after October 1, 2026, of a violation of sections 53-20 to 53-21a,
47 inclusive, section 53-23, 53a-70c, subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of
48 section 53a-86, section 53a-90a, sections 53a-196 to 53a-196f, inclusive, or
49 section 53a-196i of the general statutes shall share a primary residence
50 with a minor child, as defined in section 17a-106f of the general statutes,
LCO 2 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 6
51 unless such person is the biological parent of such minor child, or the
52 adoptive parent of such minor child and such adoption was finalized
53 prior to such conviction.
54 Sec. 4. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Not later than one week
55 following the release from a correctional facility of a person convicted
56 of and incarcerated for a violation of section 53-20, 53-21, 53-23, 53a-70c,
57 subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 53a-86, section 53a-90a,
58 sections 53a-196 to 53a-196f, inclusive, or section 53a-196i of the general
59 statutes, the Commissioner of Correction shall notify the Commissioner
60 of Children and Families of the residential address to which such person
61 was released and the violations for which such person was convicted
62 and incarcerated.
63 (b) Not later than one week after receiving a notification pursuant to
64 subsection (a) of this section, the Commissioner of Children and
65 Families shall determine if the residential address provided in said
66 notification is the address of the primary residence of a child who is the
67 subject of an order for protective supervision, as defined in section 17a-
68 93 of the general statutes, or receiving protective services, as defined in
69 section 17a-93 of the general statutes. If the commissioner determines a
70 child who is the subject of such an order or receiving such services
71 resides at such address, the commissioner shall immediately (1) notify
72 the department's social worker assigned to such case of such person's
73 release to such address and the violations for which such person was
74 convicted and incarcerated, and (2) include a copy of such notification
75 in such child's case file.
76 Sec. 5. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) Any local or regional board of
77 education that receives a withdrawal form from a parent or person
78 having control of a child who is withdrawing such child from the public
79 schools in accordance with the provisions of section 10-184 of the
80 general statutes shall notify the Commissioner of Education of such
81 withdrawal not later than two business days following receipt of such
82 withdrawal form.
LCO 3 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 6
83 (b) Not later than two business days following receipt of a notification
84 from a local or regional board of education under subsection (a) of this
85 section that a child has been withdrawn from the public schools, the
86 Commissioner of Education shall notify the Commissioner of Children
87 and Families of such withdrawal.
88 (c) Upon receipt of a notification from the Commissioner of
89 Education under subsection (b) of this section that a child has been
90 withdrawn from the public schools, the Commissioner of Children and
91 Families shall, as soon as practicable, determine if such child is the
92 subject of an order for protective supervision, as defined in section 17a-
93 93 of the general statutes, or receiving protective services, as defined in
94 section 17a-93 of the general statutes. If such child is the subject of such
95 an order or receiving such services, the Commissioner of Children and
96 Families shall include a notation of such withdrawal in such child's case
97 file for informational purposes. If such child is not the subject of such an
98 order or receiving such services, the Commissioner of Children and
99 Families shall immediately destroy all information received by the
100 commissioner related to such child and such notification.
101 Sec. 6. Section 10a-57g of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
102 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
103 October 1, 2026):
104 (a) As used in this section:
105 (1) ["Preschool through Twenty and Workforce Information
106 Network" or "P20 WIN"] "Data Link Connecticut" or "DataLinkCT"
107 means a state integrated data system utilized for the purpose of
108 matching and integrating data of state agencies and other organizations
109 to inform policy and practice for education, workforce and supportive
110 service efforts.
111 (2) "Participating agency" means the Connecticut State Colleges and
112 Universities, Department of Education, Labor Department, the Office of
113 Early Childhood, The University of Connecticut, the Connecticut
114 Conference of Independent Colleges and any entity that has executed
LCO 4 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 6
115 an enterprise memorandum of understanding for participation in [the
116 P20 WIN] DataLinkCT and has been approved for participation
117 pursuant to the terms of the enterprise memorandum of understanding.
118 (3) "Enterprise memorandum of understanding" means a
119 foundational multiparty agreement that sets forth the details of how
120 data is shared and the respective legal rights and responsibilities of each
121 party within the data sharing process.
122 (b) There is established [a Preschool through Twenty and Workforce
123 Information Network] Data Link Connecticut. The executive board of
124 [the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT, established pursuant to subsection (d) of
125 this section, shall establish processes and structures governing the
126 secure sharing of data across participating agencies.
127 (c) The Office of Policy and Management shall serve as the
128 administrator for [P20 WIN] DataLinkCT to support the executive board
129 and data governing board, develop procedures for secure sharing and
130 analysis of data and provide program management to support the
131 continued operation and maintenance of [P20 WIN] DataLinkCT, in
132 accordance with the state data plan and data sharing efforts specified in
133 sections 4-67n and 4-67p.
134 (d) [The P20 WIN] DataLinkCT shall be governed by an executive
135 board that shall provide oversight of such network. Said executive
136 board shall include, but need not be limited to, the chief executive officer
137 of each participating agency, or their respective designees, the Chief
138 Workforce Officer, or the officer's designee, and the Secretary of the
139 Office of Policy and Management, or the secretary's designee. The duties
140 of the executive board shall be to:
141 (1) Advance a vision for [the P20 WIN including] DataLinkCT that
142 includes a prioritized research agenda with support from the Office of
143 Policy and Management.
144 (2) Convene as needed to respond to issues from the data governing
145 board.
LCO 5 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 6
146 (3) Identify and work to secure resources necessary to sustain [P20
147 WIN] DataLinkCT funding.
148 (4) Support system implementation, maintenance and improvement
149 by advocating for [the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT in regard to policy,
150 legislation and resources.
151 (5) Advocate for and support the state's vision for [the P20 WIN]
152 DataLinkCT.
153 (6) Establish a data governing board to establish and implement
154 policies related to cross-agency data management, including, but not
155 limited to, data confidentiality and security in alignment with the vision
156 for [the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT and any applicable law. In establishing
157 such policies, the data governing board shall consult with the Office of
158 Policy and Management, in accordance with the provisions of sections
159 4-67n and 4-67p and other applicable statutes and policies.
160 (e) The executive board established pursuant to this section may
161 appoint advisory committees to make recommendations on data
162 stewardship, data system expansion and processes, and such other areas
163 that will advance the work of [the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT.
164 (f) (1) Each regional workforce development board established under
165 section 31-3k shall regularly submit data to [the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT
166 to report on the performance and outcomes achieved by the state's
167 workforce system, including, but not limited to, workforce training and
168 development programs that receive federal and state funds or grants.
169 Not later than September 1, 2025, the Chief Workforce Officer shall, in
170 consultation with the Labor Commissioner, the Chief Data Officer and
171 the regional workforce development boards, establish standards for the
172 submission of data by regional workforce development boards
173 specifying the data to be submitted and the form and manner in which
174 to submit such data.
175 (2) On or before January 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, the Chief
176 Workforce Officer may, in consultation with the Chief Data Officer and
LCO 6 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 6
177 the Labor Commissioner, submit to the administrator of [the P20 WIN]
178 DataLinkCT a request for data and analysis of such data for the
179 purposes of assessing performance and outcomes of the state's
180 workforce system. Such data and analysis request shall be completed by
181 the administrator of [the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT not later than August
182 15, 2022, and annually thereafter.
183 (g) Not later than October 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, each
184 constituent unit of the state system of higher education, as defined in
185 section 10a-1, and such constituent unit's central or system office, if any,
186 shall submit, in a manner that complies with the requirements of the
187 Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 USC 1232g, as amended
188 from time to time, data to [the P20 WIN] DataLinkCT to report on the
189 outcomes of postsecondary education and workforce development
190 programs operated by such constituent unit. Not later than September
191 1, 2025, the Chief Data Officer shall specify the form and manner in
192 which to submit such data. Any report produced from such data shall
193 be in aggregated form and, consistent with any other provision of state
194 or federal law, shall not include any personally identifiable information
195 of students or participants in such programs.
196 Sec. 7. Subsection (c) of section 4-124w of the 2026 supplement to the
197 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
198 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
199 (c) The Chief Workforce Officer may call upon any office,
200 department, board, commission, public institution of higher education
201 or other agency of the state to supply such reports, information, data
202 and assistance as may be reasonable, necessary and appropriate in order
203 to carry out the Chief Workforce Officer's or the Office of Workforce
204 Strategy's duties and requirements. Each officer or employee of such
205 office, department, board, commission, public institution of higher
206 education or other agency of the state shall furnish such reports,
207 information, data and assistance as requested by the Chief Workforce
208 Officer, to the extent permitted under state and federal law. Any request
209 for data from a participating agency in [P20 WIN] DataLinkCT,
LCO 7 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 6
210 established pursuant to section 10a-57g, as amended by this act, shall be
211 submitted through [P20 WIN] DataLinkCT in accordance with the
212 policies and procedures established by [P20 WIN] DataLinkCT.
213 Sec. 8. Subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section 10-15o of the 2026
214 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
215 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
216 (2) Compile and analyze data on students and young people, through
217 available data systems, including, but not limited to, [the Connecticut
218 Preschool through Twenty and Workforce Information Network] Data
219 Link Connecticut, established pursuant to section 10a-57g, as amended
220 by this act;
221 Sec. 9. Subdivision (19) of subsection (b) of section 12-15 of the 2026
222 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
223 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
224 (19) To the extent allowable under federal law, return information to
225 another state agency or to support a data request submitted through
226 [P20 WIN] DataLinkCT, established in section 10a-57g, as amended by
227 this act, in accordance with the policies and procedures of [P20 WIN]
228 DataLinkCT for the purposes of evaluation or research, provided the
229 recipient of such data enters into a data sharing agreement pursuant to
230 section 4-67aa if such recipient is not a state agency;
231 Sec. 10. Subsection (e) of section 17b-112l of the 2026 supplement to
232 the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
233 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
234 (e) Not later than July 1, 2020, pursuant to the advisory authority
235 established in section 3-125, the Office of the Attorney General, in
236 consultation with the Two-Generational Advisory Board, the Secretary
237 of the Office of Policy and Management, the Chief Data Officer
238 appointed pursuant to section 4-67p and [the Preschool through Twenty
239 and Workforce Information Network] Data Link Connecticut,
240 established pursuant to section 10a-57g, as amended by this act, shall
LCO 8 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 6
241 develop a uniform interagency data sharing protocol to remove legal
242 barriers to promote cross-agency and cross-sector collaboration under
243 this section to the fullest extent permitted under state and federal laws.
244 Sec. 11. Section 22 of public act 24-45 is repealed and the following is
245 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
246 Not later than [January 1, 2025] July 1, 2027, and [annually] biennially
247 thereafter, the executive board of [the Connecticut Preschool Through
248 Twenty and Workforce Information Network] Data Link Connecticut,
249 established pursuant to section 10a-57g of the general statutes, as
250 amended by this act, shall submit [an annual] a report on disconnected
251 youth. In developing such report, the executive board shall use the data
252 model established through the data sharing agreement 0043 regarding
253 Research on Disengaged and Disconnected Youth in Connecticut. The
254 executive board shall submit such report to the joint standing
255 committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
256 relating to education, children, the judiciary, labor, human services,
257 public health and appropriations, in accordance with the provisions of
258 section 11-4a of the general statutes. As used in this section,
259 "disconnected youth" has the same meaning as provided in section 21 of
260 [this act] public act 24-45.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026, and New section
applicable to taxable years
commencing on or after
January 1, 2026
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 6 October 1, 2026 10a-57g
Sec. 7 October 1, 2026 4-124w(c)
Sec. 8 October 1, 2026 10-15o(b)(2)
Sec. 9 October 1, 2026 12-15(b)(19)
LCO 9 of 10

Substitute Bill No. 6
Sec. 10 October 1, 2026 17b-112l(e)
Sec. 11 October 1, 2026 PA 24-45, Sec. 22
KID Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 10 of 10